Alaska statutes. Title 8. Business and Professions.
Article 2. Administration of Board Affairs.

Sec. 08.86.070.
Duties of the board.

The board shall

establish objective examination requirements for persons who apply for a license to practice psychology in the state;

examine, or cause to be examined, eligible license applicants;

approve the issuance of licenses to qualified applicants;

adopt regulations establishing standards for the practice of psychology;

impose disciplinary sanctions as authorized by this chapter;

adopt regulations requiring proof of continued competency for license renewal;

review, when requested by the department, the quality and availability of psychological services in the state;

compile information for submission to the department on the practice of psychology by psychologists and psychological associates in the state.

History.

(§ 1 ch 136 SLA 1967; am §§ 2, 3 ch 65 SLA 1973; am § 34 ch 177 SLA 1978; am §§ 6, 7, 24 ch 58 SLA 1980; am § 2 ch 29 SLA 1983; am § 1 ch 63 SLA 1986; am § 19 ch 6 SLA 1998)

Revisor’s notes. —

Former paragraphs (8) and (9) were renumbered as (7) and (8), respectively, in 1998 to reflect the 1998 repeal of former paragraph (7).

Administrative Code. —

For applications, see 12 AAC 60, art. 1.

For experience and education, see 12 AAC 60, art. 2.

For examinations, see 12 AAC 60, art. 3.

For rules of professional conduct, see 12 AAC 60, art. 4.

For reinstatement of professional privileges after discipline, see 12 AAC 60, art. 5.

For continuing education, see 12 AAC 60, art. 6.

Sec. 08.86.075.
Power to order examinations.

The board may order a licensed psychologist or licensed psychological associate to submit to a reasonable physical or mental examination if the board has credible evidence sufficient to conclude that the psychologist’s or psychological associate’s physical or mental capacity to practice safely is at issue.

History.

(§ 1 ch 51 SLA 1996)

Cross references. —

For suspension of license of person who refuses to submit to examination ordered under this section, see AS

08.86.204(b)

.

Sec. 08.86.080.
Board regulations.

The board shall adopt regulations to carry out the purposes of this chapter.

History.

(§ 1 ch 136 SLA 1967)

Administrative Code. —

For applications, see 12 AAC 60, art. 1.

For experience and education, see 12 AAC 60, art. 2.

For examinations, see 12 AAC 60, art. 3.

For rules of professional conduct, see 12 AAC 60, art. 4.

For reinstatement of professional privileges after discipline, see 12 AAC 60, art. 5.

Sec. 08.86.090.
Administrative duties of the department.

The department shall furnish administrative services for the board.

History.

(§ 1 ch 136 SLA 1967)

Sec. 08.86.100.
Applicability of the Administrative Procedure Act.

AS 44.62 (Administrative Procedure Act) applies to regulations and proceedings under this chapter.

History.

(§ 1 ch 136 SLA 1967)